Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.230

Procedure as to papers, documents, etc.

Whenever the personal property held by a liquidated bank shall consist either wholly or in part, of documents, letters, or other papers of a private nature, such documents, letters, or papers shall not be sold, but shall be retained by the director for a period of five years, and, unless sooner claimed by the owner, may be thereafter destroyed in the presence of the director and at least one other witness.

[ 2014 c 37 s 239; 1994 c 92 s 127; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.230. Prior: 1947 c 148 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3281-6. Formerly RCW 30.44.230.]